Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1775.02
Changes to section 77-1775.01; applicability.

The changes made to section 77-1775.01 by Laws 1989, LB 2, Ninety-first Legislature, First Special Session, are expressly intended to apply to all litigation pending as of November 22, 1989.

Laws 1989, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 2.